Virginia statutes. Title 33.2. Highways and Other Surface Transportation Systems.
Article 5. Allocation of Highway Funds.
§ 33.2-370.
High-priority projects program.

As used in this section, “high-priority projects” means those projects of regional or statewide significance, such as projects that reduce congestion or increase safety, accessibility, environmental quality, or economic development.

The Board shall establish a high-priority projects program and shall use funds allocated in §

33.2-358

to the program for projects and strategies that address a transportation need identified for a corridor of statewide significance or a regional network in the Statewide Transportation Plan pursuant to §

33.2-353

. From funds allocated to this program, the Board shall allocate funds to the Innovation and Technology Transportation Fund, provided that the allocation shall not exceed $25 million annually.In selecting projects and strategies for funding under this program, the Board shall screen, evaluate, and select candidate projects and strategies according to the process established pursuant to subsection B of §

33.2-214.1

.

History.

2015, c. 684.

§ 33.2-371.
Highway construction district grant programs.

As used in this section:“Land area” means the total land area of the counties within a highway construction district reduced by the area of any military reservations and state or national parks or forests within its boundaries and such other similar areas and facilities of five square miles in area or more, as may be determined by the Board.“Population” means the population according to the latest U.S. census or the latest population estimates made by the Weldon Cooper Center for Public Service of the University of Virginia, whichever is more recent.

The Board shall establish a grant program in each highway construction district to fund projects and strategies that address a need in the Statewide Transportation Plan developed pursuant to §

33.2-353

.

The Board shall solicit candidate projects and strategies from local governments for consideration in the applicable highway construction district’s grant program. Candidate projects and strategies shall be screened, evaluated, and selected by the Board according to the process established pursuant to subsection B of §

33.2-214.1

but shall be within a highway construction district and not outside such highway construction district. Candidate projects and strategies from localities within a highway construction district shall be scored against projects and strategies within the same highway construction district. Only those candidate projects and strategies submitted by a locality shall be funded.

Funds allocated to this program under §

33.2-358

shall be distributed to each highway construction district for that district’s grant program as follows:

Thirty percent based on the ratio of the population of the cities and towns eligible to receive payments pursuant to §

33.2-319

within a highway construction district to the total population of the cities and towns eligible to receive payments pursuant to §

33.2-319

within the Commonwealth;

Twenty-eight percent based on the ratio of vehicle miles traveled on primary highways within the highway construction district to the total vehicle miles traveled on primary highways in the Commonwealth;

Twenty-four percent based on the ratio of the population of counties within a highway construction district to the total population of all counties within the Commonwealth;

Ten percent based on the ratio of the number of primary lane-miles in the highway construction district to the total number of primary lane-miles within the Commonwealth;

Six percent based on the ratio of the land area of counties within the highway construction district to the total land area of counties within the Commonwealth; and

Two percent based on a primary need factor based on addressing the largest under-allocation to highway construction districts relative to primary needs.

Projects awarded funds under a grant program established by this section may be administered by the local government pursuant to §

33.2-228

or by the Department.

History.

2015, c. 684.

§ 33.2-372.
Interstate Operations and Enhancement Program.

The Board shall establish the Interstate Operations and Enhancement Program (the Program) to improve the safety, reliability, and travel flow along interstate highway corridors in the Commonwealth.

The Board may use funds in the Program to address identified needs in the Statewide Transportation Plan pursuant to §

33.2-353

or an interstate corridor plan approved by the Board through (i) operational and transportation demand management strategies and (ii) other transportation improvements, strategies, or services.

The Board, with the assistance of the Office of Intermodal Planning and Investment, shall establish a process to evaluate and prioritize potential strategies and improvements, with priority given first to operational and transportation demand management strategies that improve reliability and safety of travel.

The Board may not use funds in the Program to supplant existing levels of support as of July 1, 2019, for existing operational and transportation demand management strategies.

The Board shall distribute to the Interstate 81 Corridor Improvement Fund established pursuant to

33.2-3601

an amount equal to the revenues provided to the Program multiplied by the ratio of the vehicle miles traveled on Interstate 81 by vehicles classified as Class 6 or higher by the Federal Highway Administration to the total vehicle miles traveled on all interstate highways in the Commonwealth by vehicles classified as Class 6 or higher.

The Board shall distribute to the Northern Virginia Transportation Authority Fund established pursuant to §

33.2-2509

an amount equal to the revenues provided to the Program multiplied by the ratio of vehicle miles traveled on interstate highways in Planning District 8 by vehicles classified as Class 6 or higher by the Federal Highway Administration to the total vehicles miles traveled on all interstate highways in the Commonwealth by vehicles classified as Class 6 or higher.

For any interstate highway with more than 10 percent of total vehicle miles traveled by vehicles classified as Class 6 or higher by the Federal Highway Administration, the Board shall ensure that the total long-term expenditure for each interstate highway shall be approximately equal to the proportion of the total revenue deposited in the Fund attributable to each interstate highway based on such interstate highway’s proportional share of interstate vehicle miles traveled by vehicles classified as Class 6 or higher.

History.

2020, cc. 1230, 1275.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1230 and 1275, cl. 8 provides: “That the prioritization process established pursuant to subsection C of §

33.2-372

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall not apply to projects and strategies included or identified in the Interstate 81 Corridor Improvement Plan adopted by the Commonwealth Transportation Board on December 5, 2018.”

§ 33.2-373.
Virginia Highway Safety Improvement Program.

The Board shall establish the Virginia Highway Safety Improvement Program (the Program) to reduce motorized and nonmotorized fatalities and severe injuries on highways in the Commonwealth, whether such highways are state or locally maintained. The Board shall use funds set aside pursuant to §

33.2-358

for the Program.

Beginning in fiscal year 2024, the Board shall, after program administration costs, allocate the funds in accordance with its adopted investment strategy pursuant to subsection C as follows:

At least 54 percent for infrastructure projects that address a hazardous road location or feature and address an identified highway safety problem;

At least 29 percent for strategies and activities to address behavioral causes of crashes that result in fatalities and severe injuries; and

The remaining amount for eligible purposes under this section pursuant to the investment strategy adopted pursuant to subsection C.

The Board shall adopt an investment strategy to guide the investments of the Program. The strategy shall cover a period of at least five years and seek to achieve a significant reduction in the anticipated number of fatalities and severe injuries over the covered period and shall give priority to projects, strategies, and activities based on the expected reduction in fatalities and severe injuries relative to cost, including improvements that are widely implemented based on a high-risk roadway feature that is correlated with a particular crash type, rather than crash frequency.

History.

2020, cc. 1230, 1275.

§ 33.2-374.
Special Structure Program.

For purposes of this section, “special structure” means very large, indispensable, and unique bridges and tunnels identified by the Commissioner and approved by the Commonwealth Transportation Board.

The General Assembly declares it to be in the public interest that the maintenance, rehabilitation, and replacement of special structures in the Commonwealth occur timely as to provide and protect a safe and efficient highway system.

The Board shall establish a program for the maintenance, rehabilitation, and replacement of special structures in the Commonwealth. With the assistance of the Department of Transportation, the Board shall develop and maintain a plan for the maintenance, rehabilitation, and replacement of special structures in the Commonwealth. The plan shall cover at a minimum a 30-year period and shall be updated biennially no later than November 1 of each even-numbered year.

The Board shall use the funds allocated in §§

33.2-1524

and

33.2-1530

to the Special Structure Fund pursuant to §

33.2-1532

for maintenance, rehabilitation, and replacement of special structures to implement the plan developed pursuant to subsection C.

History.

2020, cc. 1230, 1275.